District of Columbia statutes.
44-1402

Control and supervision; name.

The institution for the custody, care, education, training, and treatment of persons with intellectual disabilities, established by § 44-1401, shall be under the control and supervision of the Department of Human Services of the District, and shall be known as Forest Haven.

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1135, ch. 460, § 1
Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 208, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2
Oct. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 1087, Pub. L. 91-490, § 1(1)
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 31, 59 DCR 5567
Charitable organizations receiving federal appropriations, board members, and adverse or pecuniary interest, see § 44-714.
Prisons and prisoners, fugitives and rewards, see § 24-201.27.
Public welfare supervision, generally, see § 4-105 et seq.
Substantially retarded persons, commitment and maintenance, Forest Haven defined, see § 21-1101.
1981 Ed., § 32-802.
1973 Ed., § 32-602.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “persons with intellectual disabilities” for “substantially retarded persons.”

Board of Public Welfare abolished: The Board of Public Welfare was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 58 as amended, redesignated as Organization Order No. 140 and amended, established, under the direction and control of a Commissioner, a Department of Public Welfare, headed by a Director with the purpose of planning, implementing, and directing public welfare programs. Reorganization Order No. 58 provided that the previously existing Board of Public Welfare would be abolished. That Order also transferred specified functions of the former Board to the Department of Public Health and the Department of Public Welfare. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Functions of the Department of Public Welfare and of the Department of Public Health as set forth in Organization Order Nos. 140 and 141, respectively, were transferred to the Director of the Department of Human Resources by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969, as amended by Commissioner’s Order No. 70-83, dated March 6, 1970. The Department of Human Resources was replaced by the Department of Human Services by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979, dated February 21, 1980.

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.